Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0775.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9a. (1) Every meeting of a public body, that is a state licensing board, state commission panel, or state rule-making board, except a meeting or part of a meeting held in closed session, must be recorded in a manner that allows for the capture of sound, including, without limitation, in any of the following formats: (a) A sound-only recording. (b) A video recording with sound and picture. (c) A digital or analog broadcast capable of being recorded. (2) A recording required under subsection (1) must be maintained for a minimum of 1 year from the date of the meeting in a format that can be reproduced upon a request under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.